Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.060

Disputes regarding reimbursement—Arbitration.

(1) A member jurisdiction that has a disagreement with another member jurisdiction regarding reimbursement for assistance under the provisions of this chapter may send a written request to the other member jurisdiction to resolve the matter within thirty days.

(2) If the dispute is not resolved within thirty days of the receipt of the written request, either party may request arbitration.

[ 2011 c 215 s 6.]